Utah statutes.
26-41-103.   Voluntary participation.

(1)  This chapter does not create a duty or standard of care for a person to be trained in the use and storage of epinephrine auto-injectors. 

(2)  Except as provided in Subsections (3) and (5), a decision by a person to successfully complete a training program under Section 26-41-104 and to make emergency epinephrine auto-injectors available under the provisions of this chapter is voluntary.

(3)  A school, school board, or school official may not prohibit or dissuade a teacher or other school employee at a primary or secondary school in the state, either public or private, from:

(a)  completing a training program under Section 26-41-104;

(b)  possessing or storing an epinephrine auto-injector on school property if:

(i)  the teacher or school employee is a qualified adult; and

(ii)  the possession and storage is in accordance with the training received under Section 26-41-104; or

(c)  administering an epinephrine auto-injector to any person, if:

(i)  the teacher or school employee is a qualified adult; and

(ii)  the administration is in accordance with the training received under Section 26-41-104.

(4)  A school, school board, or school official may encourage a teacher or other school employee to volunteer to become a qualified adult.

(5) (a)  Each primary or secondary school in the state, both public and private, shall make an emergency epinephrine auto-injector available to any teacher or other school employee who:

(i)  is employed at the school; and

(ii)  is a qualified adult.

(b)  This section does not require a school described in Subsection (5)(a) to keep more than one emergency epinephrine auto-injector on the school premises, so long as it may be quickly accessed by a teacher or other school employee, who is a qualified adult, in the event of an emergency.

(6)  No school, school board, or school official shall retaliate or otherwise take adverse action against a teacher or other school employee for:

(a)  volunteering under Subsection (2);

(b)  engaging in conduct described in Subsection (3); or

(c)  failing or refusing to become a qualified adult.



Amended by Chapter 64, 2008 General Session

